Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.116.050

Foster care endowed scholarship trust fund.

(1) The foster care endowed scholarship trust fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer.

(2) Funds appropriated by the legislature for the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund shall be deposited in the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund. When conditions in RCW 28B.116.070 are met, the office shall deposit state matching moneys from the trust fund into the foster care scholarship endowment fund.

(3) No appropriation is required for expenditures from the trust fund.

(4) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 929; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 217; 2005 c 215 s 6.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 217 and by 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 929, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.